Washington statutes.
RCW 19.98.180

Audit of warranty claims.

A supplier may not audit a dealer's records with respect to any warranty claim submitted more than one year before the audit, unless a false claim is disclosed. However, the supplier has the right to audit warranty claims submitted more than one year before the audit when the audit discloses a false claim.

[ 2002 c 236 s 11.]